Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB59.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1901-A(4), 1902-A(a)(1) and 1912-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:Section 1901-A. Definitions.--The following words and phrases, as used in this article, shall, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, have the following meaning:* * *(4) "Community college" shall mean a public college or technical institute which is established and operated in accordance with the provisions of this act by a local sponsor 1234567891011121314151617181920 which provides a two-year, four-year, postsecondary, college-parallel, terminal-general, terminal-technical, out-of-school youth or adult education program or any combination of these. The community college may also provide area career and technical education services and credit, nonremedial college courses to secondary senior high school students.* * *Section 1902-A. Powers and Duties of State Board of Education.--(a) The State Board of Education shall have the power, and its duty shall be:(1) To adopt such policies, standards, rules and regulations formulated by the Council of Higher Education, as may be necessary to provide for the establishment, operation and maintenance of community colleges, including minimum requirements for physical facilities and equipment, curriculum, faculty, standards and professional requirements, qualifications for admission and advancement of students, student enrollment, student population of the area to be served by the community college, requirements for satisfactory completion of a two-year or four-year program and the degrees or diplomas or certificates to be awarded therefor, means of financing and financial resources for the establishment and support of the community college, and all matters necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act.* * *Section 1912-A. Degrees.--(a) The State Board of Education shall prescribe the types of diplomas, certificates or degrees that may be granted students who complete post-secondary education courses in community colleges.(b) The board of trustees of a community college may offer a 20250SB0059PN0022 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 baccalaureate of science degree in nursing to students who have or are pursuing an associate's degree in nursing.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0059PN0022 - 3 - 123